North Carolina, session 2025, SB879.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Franklinton Center at Bricks,
Inc., for operating expenses and capital improvements.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S879-v-1*